Utah statutes.
41-1a-1218 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Uninsured motorist identification fee for tracking motor vehicle insurance -- Exemption -- Deposit.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), at the time application is made for registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter, the applicant shall pay an uninsured motorist identification fee of $1 on each motor vehicle.

(b)  The following are exempt from the fee required under Subsection (1)(a):

(i)  a commercial vehicle registered as part of a fleet under Section 41-1a-222 or Section 41-1a-301;

(ii)  a motor vehicle that is exempt from the registration fee under Section 41-1a-1209 or Subsection 41-1a-419(3); and

(iii)  a motor vehicle with a Purple Heart special group license plate issued in accordance with Section 41-1a-421.

(2)  The revenue generated under this section shall be deposited in the Uninsured Motorist Identification Restricted Account created in Section 41-12a-806.

